North Carolina, session 2025, HB428.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Public Instruction shall conduct a study to evaluate
how certain policies may decrease the rate of recurring disciplinary infractions with a focus on
parental involvement. At a minimum, the Department shall study the likely impact of the
following:
(1) Requiring a parent to attend a meeting with the student and school personnel
as a condition of a student returning to the classroom after being removed
from the classroom for disciplinary reasons.
(2) Requiring a parent to attend counseling as a condition of a student returning
to a classroom after being removed from the classroom for disciplinary
reasons, including the availability of resources for the counseling both in and
outside of the school.
(3) Requiring a parent and the student to attend joint counseling as a condition of
a student returning to a classroom after being removed from the classroom for
disciplinary reasons, including the availability of resources for the counseling
both in and outside of the school.
(4) Requiring a student to attend remote instruction instead of returning to the
classroom, and any social or academic impacts that may have.
(5) Any additional evidence-based practices that subject matter experts identify
to decrease disciplinary infractions.
SECTION 2. This study shall not include review of any student discipline infractions
involving students with an Individualized Education Plan or a 504 Behavioral plan. This study
shall not make any recommendations regarding students with an Individualized Education Plan
or 504 Behavioral plan.
SECTION 3. The Department of Public Instruction is authorized to work with a
third-party organization to complete this study.
SECTION 4. The Department of Public Instruction shall report the results of its
study and its recommendations, including any proposed legislative changes, to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than April 15, 2026.
*H428-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to conduct the study and develop the report required by this act.
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 428-First Edition